Maryland, session 2025, HB1507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–522.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1507*

HOUSE BILL 1507
(b) State personnel, as defined in § 12–101 of the State Government Article, are
immune from suit in courts of the State and from liability in tort for a tortious act or
omission that is within the scope of the public duties of the State personnel and is made
without malice or gross negligence, and for which the State or its units have waived
immunity under Title 12, Subtitle 1 of the State Government Article, even if the damages
exceed the limits of that waiver.
Article – State Government
12–101.
(a) In this subtitle, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, “State
personnel” means:
(6) (I) a sheriff or deputy sheriff of a county or Baltimore City; OR
(II) AN EMPLOYEE OF THE OFFICE OF A SHERIFF OF A COUNTY
OR BALTIMORE CITY;
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.